Georgia, session 2025_26, SB55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dignity and Pay Act."
SECTION 2.
Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to labor and industrial relations,
is amended by revising Code Section 34-4-4, relating to authority of commissioner to grant
exemptions from operation of chapter, as follows:
S. B. 55
- 1 -

LC 55 0416
"34-4-4.
(a) The Commissioner of Labor is authorized to grant exemptions to certain categories of
organizations and businesses for the purpose of exempting them from the operation of this
chapter. The exemptions so granted shall be based upon considerations of the value of
allowing certain classes of persons to be employed at rates below the minimum rate
because of overriding considerations of public policy to allow employment of certain
persons with disabilities and others who cannot otherwise compete effectively in the labor
market.
(b) The Commissioner of Labor is authorized to conduct investigations and compile
information as to the reasons for granting exemptions to certain organizations and
businesses pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. The Commissioner is required
to maintain a list of such exemptions, along with the records of the investigations
conducted and the basis for the granting of such exemptions, which list and records shall
be a public record. Reserved."
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended in Code Section 34-6A-4, relating to prohibited discriminatory
activities, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(a.1)(1) No employer shall utilize a certificate issued by the United States Department
of Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. Section 214(c) to pay individuals with disabilities who
are employed by such employer less than the minimum wage required to be paid by
employers to employees under federal law.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 34-4-3 and
paragraph (1) of this subsection, any employer that was issued a certificate by the United
States Department of Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. Section 214(c) on or before
July 1, 2025, may utilize such certificate to pay individuals with disabilities employed by
S. B. 55
- 2 -

LC 55 0416
such employer less than the minimum wage required to be paid by employers to
employees under federal law; provided, however, that:
(A) During the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, such employer shall pay
individuals with disabilities at least half of the minimum wage required to be paid by
employers to employees under federal law; and
(B) On and after July 1, 2027, such employer shall no longer utilize such certificate to
pay individuals with disabilities less than the minimum wage required to be paid by
employers to employees under federal law."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 55
- 3 -